District of Columbia statutes.
Not funded

10-167

Crispus Attucks Park indemnification

(a)

[Not funded].

Editor's Notes

Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 16-202 provided that this section shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 16-202 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 16-202, are not in effect.